Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-808.01
Ballot for early voting; application; distribution by mail; requirements; applicability.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person or organization distributing an application by mail for a ballot for early voting shall:

(a) Use the form prescribed by the Secretary of State. The form shall contain on the top of the first page in bold type (i) the identity of the person or organization distributing the form and (ii) the following statements:

You may submit this form if you wish to request a ballot for early voting. You do not need to complete this form if you have already requested a ballot for early voting for this election; and

(b) If enclosing a return envelope, have either a blank address or the address of the election commissioner or county clerk printed on the envelope.

(2) This section shall not apply to an application for a ballot for early voting distributed by the Secretary of State, an election commissioner, or a county clerk.

Laws 2022, LB843, § 31;

Laws 2024, LB287, § 39.